Connecticut, session 2026, SB00135.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 10-95h of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
3 (a) Not later than November thirtieth each year, the joint standing
4 committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
5 relating to education, higher education and employment advancement
6 and labor shall meet with [the chairperson of the Technical Education
7 and Career System board,] the superintendent of the Technical
8 Education and Career System, the executive director of the Technical
9 Education and Career System, the Labor Commissioner and such other
10 persons as they deem appropriate to consider the items submitted
11 pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
12 (b) On or before November fifteenth, annually: The executive director
13 of the Technical Education and Career System shall submit the
SB135 / File No. 46 1

SB135 File No. 46
14 following to the joint standing committees of the General Assembly
15 having cognizance of matters relating to education, higher education
16 and employment advancement and labor: (1) Information ensuring that
17 the curriculum of the Technical Education and Career System is
18 incorporating those workforce skills required for future workforce
19 development; (2) information regarding the employment status of
20 students who graduate from or complete an approved program of study
21 at the Technical Education and Career System, including, but not
22 limited to: (A) Demographics such as age and gender, (B) course and
23 program enrollment and completion, (C) employment status, and (D)
24 available wage data; (3) an assessment of the adequacy of the resources
25 available to the Technical Education and Career System as the system
26 develops and refines programs to meet existing and emerging
27 workforce needs; [(4) recommendations to the Technical Education and
28 Career System board to carry out the provisions of subdivisions (1) to
29 (3), inclusive, of this subsection; and (5)] and (4) information regarding
30 staffing needs at each technical education and career school for the
31 current academic year. The executive director shall collaborate with the
32 Labor Commissioner to obtain information as needed to carry out the
33 provisions of this subsection.
34 Sec. 2. Section 10-95i of the general statutes is repealed and the
35 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
36 (a) Not later than January 1, [2020] 2030, and every five years
37 thereafter, the executive director of the Technical Education and Career
38 System [board shall adopt] shall develop a long-range plan of priorities
39 and goals for the Technical Education and Career System. The plan shall
40 address coordination with other providers of vocational, technical,
41 technological or postsecondary education or training and shall include
42 (1) an analysis of the activities described in subsections (b) and (c) of this
43 section and how such activities relate to the long-range plan of priorities
44 and goals, and (2) a summary of activities related to capital
45 improvements and equipment pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.
46 [Upon adoption of the plan, the board] The executive director shall file
47 the plan directly with the joint standing committees of the General
SB135 / File No. 46 2

SB135 File No. 46
48 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to education, finance,
49 revenue and bonding and appropriations and the budgets of state
50 agencies in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a. [The state
51 board shall use the plan in preparing its five-year comprehensive plan
52 pursuant to subsection (c) of section 10-4.]
53 (b) During the five-year period beginning January 1, 2020, and during
54 each five-year period thereafter, the board shall evaluate each existing
55 technical education and career school trade program in accordance with
56 a schedule which the [board] executive director of the Technical
57 Education and Career System shall establish. A trade program may be
58 reauthorized for a period of not more than five years following each
59 evaluation on the basis of: The projected employment demand for
60 students enrolled in the trade program, including consideration of the
61 employment of graduates of the program during the preceding five
62 years; anticipated technological changes; the availability of qualified
63 instructors; the existence of similar programs at other educational
64 institutions; and student interest in the trade program. As part of the
65 evaluation, the board shall consider geographic differences that may
66 make a trade program feasible at one school and not another and
67 whether certain combinations of program offerings shall be required.
68 [Prior to any final decision on the reauthorization of a trade program,
69 the board shall consult with the program advisory committees for the
70 trade program being evaluated.]
71 (c) [The] Upon the joint recommendation of the executive director
72 and superintendent of the Technical Education and Career System, the
73 board shall consider the addition of new trade programs. Decisions by
74 the board to add such programs shall at a minimum be based on the (1)
75 projected employment demand for graduates of the program, (2) cost of
76 establishing the program, (3) availability of qualified instructors, (4)
77 existence of similar programs at other educational institutions, (5)
78 interest of students in the trade, (6) need to diversify the trade with
79 workers from underrepresented populations, and (7) workforce training
80 needs of (A) students, graduates and residents of alliance districts, as
81 defined in section 10-262u, and priority school districts, as described in
SB135 / File No. 46 3

SB135 File No. 46
82 section 10-266p, and (B) students and graduates of priority schools, as
83 defined in section 10-265e. The board shall authorize new trade
84 programs for a maximum of five years. The board shall provide a
85 process for the public, including, but not limited to, employers, parents,
86 students or teachers, to request consideration of the establishment of a
87 new trade program.
88 (d) The [board] executive director of the Technical Education and
89 Career System shall maintain a rolling three-year capital improvement
90 and capital equipment plan that identifies: (1) Alterations, renovations
91 and repairs that each technical education and career school is expected
92 to need, including, but not limited to, grounds and athletic fields,
93 heating and ventilation systems, wiring, roofs, and windows, and the
94 cost of such projects, (2) recommendations for energy efficiency
95 improvements to each school and the cost of such improvements, and
96 (3) the specific equipment each technical education and career school is
97 expected to need, based on the useful life of existing equipment and
98 projections of changing technology and the estimated cost of the
99 equipment. The [board] executive director shall submit such plan,
100 annually, directly to the joint standing committees of the General
101 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to education, finance,
102 revenue and bonding and appropriations and the budgets of state
103 agencies in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a.
104 Sec. 3. Section 10-95j of the general statutes is repealed and the
105 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
106 The executive director of the Technical Education and Career System
107 [board] shall include in the report required pursuant to section 10-95k,
108 as amended by this act, a summary of the following:
109 (1) Admissions policies for the Technical Education and Career
110 System;
111 (2) Recruitment and retention of faculty;
112 (3) Efforts to strengthen consideration of the needs of and to develop
SB135 / File No. 46 4

SB135 File No. 46
113 greater public awareness of the Technical Education and Career System;
114 and
115 (4) Efforts to strengthen the role of program advisory committees and
116 increase employer participation.
117 Sec. 4. Section 10-95k of the general statutes is repealed and the
118 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
119 (a) Not later than January 1, [2017] 2027, and biennially thereafter, the
120 executive director of the Technical Education and Career System [board]
121 shall prepare a summary report concerning the Technical Education and
122 Career System and shall submit the report directly to the joint standing
123 committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
124 relating to education in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a.
125 The report shall include demographic information for the preceding two
126 school years on applicants for admission, students enrolled and
127 graduates, and a summary of the capital and operating expenditures.
128 Such information shall be provided for the Technical Education and
129 Career System and for each technical education and career school and
130 satellite facility. Enrollment information shall be reported by race and
131 sex and by specific trade programs. Applicant information shall include
132 the number of applicants, the number accepted and the number enrolled
133 reported by race and sex. Enrollment capacity for each school and
134 projected enrollment capacity for the subsequent school year shall be
135 developed on the basis of a standardized format and shall be reported
136 for each school and satellite facility. The report shall also include
137 assessment of student outcomes including, but not limited to, mastery
138 examination results pursuant to section 10-14n, retention and
139 completion rates, and postsecondary education or employment based
140 on graduate follow-up and, for purposes of employment placement,
141 state unemployment insurance wage records.
142 (b) Reports prepared and submitted pursuant to subsection (a) of this
143 section, [on and after January 1, 2017,] shall identify each technical
144 education and career school for which enrollment on the preceding
145 October first was less than seventy per cent of the enrollment capacity
SB135 / File No. 46 5

SB135 File No. 46
146 identified in the report pursuant to this section for the prior year. For
147 each such school the report shall include an analysis of: (1) The reasons
148 for such enrollment, including, but not limited to, the interest in the
149 specific trade programs offered, the resources needed to serve special
150 education students, demographic changes and the existence of
151 alternative vocational, technical and technological educational training
152 programs in the region in which the school is located; (2) the likelihood
153 that enrollment will increase or decrease in the future; (3) any alternative
154 uses for unused space in the facility; and (4) a recommendation on the
155 steps to be taken to improve enrollment or a timetable for closing the
156 school. [In preparing the analysis, the Technical Education and Career
157 System board shall provide an opportunity for public comment.]
158 Sec. 5. Section 10-95p of the general statutes is repealed and the
159 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
160 (a) [There is established a division of postsecondary educational
161 programs within the Technical Education and Career System.] The
162 [division] Technical Education and Career System shall administer any
163 postsecondary educational program that (1) was offered at a technical
164 education and career school during the school year commencing July 1,
165 2016, or (2) is approved by the Technical Education and Career System
166 board.
167 (b) Any student admitted for enrollment in a postsecondary
168 educational program administered by the [division] Technical
169 Education and Career System shall have a high school diploma or its
170 equivalent, or have completed the school year in which such student
171 reaches twenty-two years of age.
172 Sec. 6. Section 10-95q of the general statutes is repealed and the
173 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
174 (a) (1) On and after July 1, 2022, the Technical Education and Career
175 System board shall recommend [a candidate] candidates for
176 superintendent of the Technical Education and Career System to the
177 executive director of the Technical Education and Career System. The
SB135 / File No. 46 6

SB135 File No. 46
178 executive director may hire or reject any candidate for superintendent
179 recommended by the board. [If the executive director rejects a candidate
180 for superintendent, the board shall recommend another candidate for
181 superintendent to the executive director until the executive director
182 hires a candidate for superintendent.]
183 [(2) The term of office of the superintendent shall be three years and
184 may be extended by the executive director, after consultation with the
185 Technical Education and Career System board regarding such
186 extension, for no more than three years at any one time.]
187 [(3)] (2) (A) No candidate may be hired as, or assume the duties and
188 responsibilities of, the superintendent until the executive director
189 receives written confirmation from the Commissioner of Education that
190 such candidate is properly certified under chapter 166 or has been
191 granted a waiver of certification by the commissioner pursuant to
192 subsection (c) of section 10-157.
193 (B) The board may recommend, and the executive director may hire,
194 a candidate who is not properly certified under chapter 166 to serve as
195 acting superintendent for a probationary period not to exceed one
196 school year, provided the executive director receives approval from the
197 Commissioner of Education. During such probationary period such
198 acting superintendent shall assume all duties of the superintendent for
199 the time specified and shall successfully complete a school leadership
200 program, approved by the State Board of Education, offered at [a public
201 or private] an institution of higher education in the state. At the
202 conclusion of such probationary period, the executive director may
203 request the commissioner to grant a waiver of certification for such
204 acting superintendent pursuant to subsection (c) of section 10-157, or a
205 one-time extension of such probationary period, not to exceed one
206 additional school year, if the commissioner determines that the
207 executive director has demonstrated a significant need or hardship for
208 such extension.
209 (b) [(1)] The superintendent of the Technical Education and Career
210 System shall be responsible for the operation, supervision and
SB135 / File No. 46 7

SB135 File No. 46
211 administration of the technical education and career schools and all
212 other matters relating to vocational, technical, technological and
213 postsecondary education in the system. The superintendent [, in
214 consultation with the executive director, shall develop and revise, as
215 necessary, administrative] shall recommend to the executive director of
216 the Technical Education and Career System policies for the operation of
217 the technical education and career schools and programs offered in the
218 system. Any such administrative policies developed or revised under
219 this subdivision shall not be deemed to be regulations, as defined in
220 section 4-166.
221 [(2) The executive director, in consultation with the board, shall
222 evaluate, at least annually, the performance of the superintendent in
223 accordance with guidelines and criteria established by the executive
224 director and the board.]
225 Sec. 7. Subsection (d) of section 10-95r of the 2026 supplement to the
226 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
227 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
228 (d) The executive director may, upon approval of the board, accept
229 gifts, grants and donations on behalf of the system, including, but not
230 limited to, in-kind donations, designated for the purchase of equipment
231 or materials, the hiring of teachers at a technical education and career
232 school or the acquisition of real property and the construction of
233 facilities, except no employee of the system may accept any gift, grant
234 or donation as an individual, or on behalf of the system, that is for
235 personal use. Any gift, grant or donation accepted on behalf of the
236 system shall be in accordance with the state code of ethics for public
237 officials set forth in chapter 10. [The executive director shall submit
238 quarterly reports to the Office of Policy and Management concerning all
239 gifts, grants or donations received pursuant to this subsection.]
240 Sec. 8. Section 10-95s of the general statutes is repealed and the
241 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
242 (a) The Technical Education and Career System shall be advised by a
SB135 / File No. 46 8

SB135 File No. 46
243 Technical Education and Career System board. The board shall consist
244 of eleven members as follows: (1) Two members appointed by the
245 Governor who shall have experience in manufacturing or a trade offered
246 by the Technical Education and Career System, or who are alumni of the
247 system, (2) two members appointed by the Governor who are executives
248 of Connecticut-based employers and who have been nominated by the
249 Governor's Workforce Council, established pursuant to section 31-3h,
250 (3) the Commissioner of Education, or the commissioner's designee, (4)
251 the Commissioner of Economic and Community Development, or the
252 commissioner's designee, (5) the Labor Commissioner, or the
253 commissioner's designee, (6) the Chief Workforce Officer, or the officer's
254 designee, and (7) three members appointed by the Governor. Members
255 of the board appointed by the Governor shall be so appointed with the
256 advice and consent of the General Assembly, in accordance with the
257 provisions of section 4-7. Any vacancy shall be filled in the manner
258 provided in section 4-19. The Governor shall appoint the chairperson
259 and may remove a member for inefficiency, neglect of duty or
260 misconduct in office. Members of the board shall not be employees of
261 the Technical Education and Career System.
262 (b) The board shall advise the superintendent of the Technical
263 Education and Career System and the executive director of the Technical
264 Education and Career System on matters relating to vocational,
265 technical, technological and postsecondary education and training. The
266 board may create [any advisory boards or] and appoint any committees
267 as it deems necessary for the efficient conduct of its business. The
268 executive director, in conjunction with the superintendent, may arrange
269 for training to be provided to the board at such times, and on such
270 matters, as are deemed appropriate to assist the board in the conduct of
271 its business.
272 (c) The board may (1) recommend to the executive director and
273 superintendent [policies] strategies to attract and retain students who
274 will pursue careers that meet workforce needs, and [govern the
275 admission of students to any technical education and career school in
276 compliance with state and federal law] (2) provide information to the
SB135 / File No. 46 9

SB135 File No. 46
277 executive director and superintendent on industry trends to consider
278 during program planning.
279 (d) The [board shall establish specific achievement goals for students
280 at the technical education and career schools at each grade level. The
281 board shall measure] executive director and superintendent shall
282 annually publish a report on the performance of each technical
283 education and career school and shall identify a set of quantifiable
284 measures to be used. The measures shall include factors such as the
285 performance of students on standardized academic assessments, trade-
286 related assessment tests, dropout rates and graduation rates.
287 Sec. 9. Section 10-95t of the general statutes is repealed and the
288 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
289 (a) Not later than January 1, 2019, the [board of the technical high
290 school system] executive director of the Technical Education and Career
291 System and the superintendent of the [technical high school system]
292 Technical Education and Career System shall develop and submit a plan
293 to address vocational, technical and technological education, training
294 and work experience for children in post-conviction justice system
295 custody. The plan shall provide that the education, training and work
296 experience provided shall, at a minimum, ensure that each such child
297 has the opportunity to earn at least one credit to meet high school
298 graduation requirements under section 10-221a. The plan may be
299 incorporated into the biennial report required under section 10-95k, as
300 amended by this act, and shall be separately submitted to the joint
301 standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
302 matters relating to education in accordance with the provisions of
303 section 11-4a and to the Juvenile Justice Policy and Oversight
304 Committee established pursuant to section 46b-121n.
305 (b) For the purposes of this section:
306 (1) "Post-conviction justice system custody" means physical or legal
307 custody or control of a child in a facility or program run by or contracted
308 with the Department of Correction, or the Court Support Services
SB135 / File No. 46 10

SB135 File No. 46
309 Division of the Judicial Branch, pursuant to an adjudication or
310 conviction for a delinquent act or criminal offense; and
311 (2) "Child" means child, as defined in section 10-253.
312 Sec. 10. Section 10-95u of the general statutes is repealed and the
313 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
314 (a) Not later than October 1, 2019, the Technical Education and Career
315 System board, in consultation with the Labor Department, shall identify
316 and develop a list of careers in critical construction trades that are
317 essential to the construction workforce needs of the state. The board
318 shall consider the factors described in subdivisions (1) to (7), inclusive,
319 of subsection (c) of section 10-95i, as amended by this act, when
320 identifying such critical construction trades. The [board] executive
321 director of the Technical Education and Career System may
322 subsequently identify, as necessary, additional critical construction
323 trades, and shall revise the list of critical construction trades identified
324 pursuant to this subsection.
325 (b) Not later than July 1, 2020, the board shall, within available
326 appropriations, develop a plan to create new or expand existing
327 programs in critical construction trades identified pursuant to
328 subsection (a) of this section. Upon the subsequent identification of
329 additional critical construction trades, the [board] executive director
330 shall develop a plan to create new or expand existing programs for such
331 additional critical construction trades.
332 (c) The [board] executive director shall post, and update as necessary,
333 a list of the critical construction trades and all programs in critical
334 construction trades offered at technical education and career schools on
335 the Internet web site of the Technical Education and Career System.
336 Sec. 11. Section 10-97a of the general statutes is repealed and the
337 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
338 The [superintendent] executive director of the Technical Education
339 and Career System shall arrange for the annual inspection, in
SB135 / File No. 46 11

SB135 File No. 46
340 accordance with the provisions of section 14-282a, of [those school
341 buses, as defined in section 14-275,] student transportation vehicles in
342 operation in the Technical Education and Career System.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 10-95h
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 10-95i
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 10-95j
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 10-95k
Sec. 5 from passage 10-95p
Sec. 6 October 1, 2026 10-95q
Sec. 7 July 1, 2026 10-95r(d)
Sec. 8 July 1, 2026 10-95s
Sec. 9 October 1, 2026 10-95t
Sec. 10 October 1, 2026 10-95u
Sec. 11 October 1, 2026 10-97a
ED Joint Favorable
SB135 / File No. 46 12

SB135 File No. 46
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill has no fiscal impact. It makes a variety of technical and
procedural changes relating to the Connecticut Technical Education and
Career System.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB135 / File No. 46 13

SB135 File No. 46
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 135
AN ACT IMPLEMENTING THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE
TECHNICAL EDUCATION AND CAREER SYSTEM.